es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea > Piezas para patines de ruedas: Rodamientos para patines de ruedas; Frenos para patines de ruedas; Planchas para patines sobre ruedas; Bases para patines sobre ruedas; Ejes para patines sobre ruedas; Ruedas para patines
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Rolanje in kotalkanje > Deli za kotalke: Ležaji za kotalke; Zavore za kotalke; Okvirji za kotalke; Plošče za kotalke; Podvozja za kotalke; Kolesa za kotalke
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trượt pa-tanh và pa-tanh một hàng > Phụ tùng trượt pa-tanh: Vòng bi trượt pa-tanh con lăn; Phanh trượt pa-tanh con lăn; Khung giày trượt patin 4 bánh; Đế gắn bánh giày trượt patin 4 bánh; Trục bánh xe giày trượt patin 4 bánh; Bánh trượt pa-tanh con lăn
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Inline ve Roller Paten > Roller Paten Parçaları: Paten Rulmanları; Paten Frenleri; Tekerlekli paten çerçeveleri; Tekerlekli paten plakaları; Tekerlekli paten dingilleri; Paten Tekerlekleri
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > インラインスケート・ローラースケート > ローラースケート靴パーツ: ローラースケート靴ベアリング; ローラースケート靴ブレーキ; ローラースケート用フレーム; ローラースケート用プレート; ローラースケート用トラック; ローラースケート靴ホイール
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Patinação inline e sobre rodas > Peças para patins sobre rodas: Rolamentos para patins sobre rodas; Freios para patins sobre rodas; Bases para patins tradicionais; Placas para patins tradicionais; Trucks para patins tradicionais; Rodas para patins sobre rodas
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > In-line a kolečkové brusle > Díly na kolečkové brusle: Ložiska pro kolečkové brusle; Brzdy pro kolečkové brusle; Rámy na trekové brusle; Desky na trekové brusle; Podvozky na trekové brusle; Kolečka pro kolečkové brusle
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Rullaluistelu > Rullaluistimien osat: Rullaluistimien laakerit; Rullaluistimien jarrut; Rullaluistimien rungot; Rullaluistimien pohjalevyt; Rullaluistimien trukit; Rullaluistimien pyörät
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Inline- és görkorcsolya > Görkorcsolya-alkatrészek: Görkorcsolya-csapágyak; Görkorcsolya-fékek; Kétsoros görkorcsolya sínek; Kétsoros görkorcsolya talplemezek; Kétsoros görkorcsolya truckok; Görkorcsolya-kerekek
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Skaten > Rollschuh-Teile: Rollschuh-Kugellager; Rollschuhbremsen; Rollschuh-Schienen; Rollschuh-Platten; Rollschuh-Achsen; Rollschuhrollen
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > อินไลน์และโรลเลอร์สเกต > ชิ้นส่วนของโรลเลอร์สเกต: ตลับลูกปืนโรลเลอร์สเกต; เบรกโรลเลอร์สเกต; เฟรมโรลเลอร์สเกต; เพลตโรลเลอร์สเกต; ทรัคโรลเลอร์สเกต; ล้อโรลเลอร์สเกต
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Inlineskaten en rollerskaten > Onderdelen voor rollerskaten: Lagers voor rollerskaten; Remmen voor rollerskaten; Frames voor rolschaatsen; Platen voor rolschaatsen; Trucks voor rolschaatsen; Wielen voor rollerskaten
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale > Componenti per pattini tradizionali: Cuscinetti per pattini a rotelle; Freni per pattini a rotelle; Telai per pattini a rotelle; Piastre per pattini a rotelle; Truck per pattini a rotelle; Ruote per pattini a rotelle
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Patinagem com patins em linha e de 4 rodas > Peças para patins de 4 rodas: Rolamentos para patins de 4 rodas; Travões para patins de 4 rodas; Chassi para patins de 4 rodas; Placas base para patins de 4 rodas; Trucks para patins de 4 rodas; Rodas para patins de 4 rodas
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 인라인/롤러 스케이팅 > 롤러 스케이트 부품: 롤러 스케이트 베어링; 롤러 스케이트 브레이크; 롤러스케이트 프레임; 롤러스케이트 플레이트; 롤러스케이트 트럭; 롤러 스케이트 바퀴
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 直排轮滑/四轮旱冰 > 四轮旱冰部件: 双排轮滑鞋轴承; 双排轮滑鞋刹车; 双排轮滑鞋轮架; 双排轮滑鞋底板; 双排轮滑鞋桥; 双排轮滑鞋滑轮
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių sportas > Riedučių dalys: Riedučių guoliai; Riedučių stabdžiai; Riedučių rėmai; Riedučių plokštės; Riedučių ašys; Riedučių ratukai
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jazda na wrotkach i łyżworolkach > Części do wrotek: Łożyska do wrotek; Hamulce do wrotek; Płozy do wrotek; Płyty do wrotek; Tracki do wrotek; Kółka do wrotek
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Rulleskøjter og inlinere > Reservedele til rulleskøjter: Rulleskøjter – lejer; Rulleskøjter – bremser; Rammer til rulleskøjter; Plader til rulleskøjter; Trucks til rulleskøjter; Rulleskøjter – hjul
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Rolanje i koturanje > Dijelovi za koturaljke: Ležajevi za koturaljke; Kočnice za koturaljke; Okviri za koturaljke; Ploče za koturaljke; Osovine za koturaljke; Kotačići za koturaljke
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazda na inline a kolieskových korčuliach > Diely na kolieskové korčule: Ložiská na kolieskové korčule; Brzdy na kolieskové korčule; Rámy na kolieskové korčule; Základne pre kolieskové korčule; Podvozky pre kolieskové korčule; Kolieska na kolieskové korčule
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Patinaj cu role în linie și patinaj cu rotile > Piese pentru patine cu rotile: Rulmenți pentru patine cu rotile; Frâne pentru patine cu rotile; Cadre pentru role; Plăci pentru patine cu rotile; Axuri pentru patine cu rotile; Rotile pentru patine cu rotile
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Πατινάζ εντός & εκτός δρόμου > Εξαρτήματα πατινιών: Ρουλεμάν πατινιών; Φρένα πατινιών; Σκελετοί ρόλερ; Πλάκες ρόλερ; Άξονες ρόλερ; Ρόδες πατινιών
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Patin à roulettes et roller > Pièces de patins à roulettes: Roulements de patins à roulettes; Freins de patins à roulettes; Platines de patins à roulettes; Plaques de patins à roulettes; Trucks de patins à roulettes; Roues de patins à roulettes
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Inline- och rullskridskoåkning > Rullskridskotillbehör: Rullskridskolager; Rullskridskobromsar; Chassin till rullskridskor; Plattor till rullskridskor; Truckar till rullskridskor; Rullskridskohjul
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 直排輪/雙排輪 > 雙排輪零件: 雙排輪軸承; 雙排輪煞車; 滑輪底座; 滑輪底板; 滑輪轉向架; 雙排輪滑輪
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Inline & Roller Skating > Roller Skate Parts: Roller Skate Bearings; Roller Skate Brakes; Roller Skate Frames; Roller Skate Plates; Roller Skate Trucks; Roller Skate Wheels
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на ролери и ролкови кънки > Части за ролкови кънки: Лагери за ролкови кънки; Спирачки за ролкови кънки; Рамки за ролкови кънки; Плочи за ролкови кънки; Колесари за ролкови кънки; Колела за ролкови кънки
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на роликах > Детали для роликов-квадов: Подшипники для роликов-квадов; Тормоза для роликов-квадов; Рамы для роликовых коньков; Платформы для роликовых коньков; Подвески (траки) для роликовых коньков; Колеса для роликов-квадов
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Inline og rulleskøyter > Deler til rulleskøyter: Kulelagre til rulleskøyter; Bremser til rulleskøyter; Rammer for rulleskøyter; Plater for rulleskøyter; Trucker for rulleskøyter; Hjul til rulleskøyter